Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.900

Transfer of energy education, applied research, and technology transfer programs from state energy office.

(1) All powers, duties, and functions of the state energy office under RCW 43.21F.045 relating to implementing energy education, applied research, and technology transfer programs shall be transferred to Washington State University.

(2) The specific programs transferred to Washington State University shall include but not be limited to the following: Renewable energy, energy software, industrial energy efficiency, education and information, energy ideas clearinghouse, and telecommunications.

(3)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the state energy office pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be delivered to the custody of Washington State University. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, software, database, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the state energy office in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be made available to Washington State University.

(b) Any appropriations made to, any other funds provided to, or any grants made to or contracts with the state energy office for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on July 1, 1996, be transferred and credited to Washington State University.

(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, software, database, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, an arbitrator mutually agreed upon by the parties in dispute shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(d) All rules and all pending business before the state energy office pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be continued and acted upon by Washington State University. All existing contracts, grants, and obligations, excluding personnel contracts and obligations, shall remain in full force and shall be assigned to and performed by Washington State University.

(e) The transfer of the powers, duties, and functions of the state energy office does not affect the validity of any act performed before July 1, 1996.

(f) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section, the director of the office of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation.

(4) Washington State University shall enter into an interagency agreement with the department of commerce regarding the relationship between policy development and public outreach. The department of commerce shall provide Washington State University available existing and future oil overcharge restitution and federal energy block funding for a minimum period of five years to carry out energy programs. Nothing in chapter 186, Laws of 1996 prohibits Washington State University from seeking grant funding for energy-related programs directly from other entities.

(5) Washington State University shall select and appoint existing state energy office employees to positions to perform the duties and functions transferred. Employees appointed by Washington State University are exempt from the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW unless otherwise designated by the institution. Any future vacant or new positions will be filled using Washington State University's standard hiring procedures.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2008; 1996 c 186 s 201.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.

Findings—Intent—Part headings not law—Effective date—1996 c 186: See notes following RCW 43.330.904.